California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) The right of eminent domain may not be exercised to acquire property, any interest in property, or use of any property for the trails contemplated pursuant to this article.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of this section, the director may, pursuant to Section 5006, replace property or interests in property through the exercise of eminent domain whenever a trail, or a portion thereof, has been acquired through the exercise of eminent domain by another public entity; provided, that the property to be acquired is in the immediate vicinity of the property being replaced, and the director may, pursuant to Section 5006, acquire property or interests in property through the exercise of eminent domain for trails established pursuant to this article in hardship cases as determined by the department. Acquisitions pursuant to this section shall be funded by moneys appropriated as provided in Section 5075.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5074.5.

The location of a route or complementary facility of the system across lands under the jurisdiction of a federal agency shall be by contractual agreement between the director and the appropriate federal agency. The director may enter into such agreements, and, subject to the provisions of Section 5075, may expend funds in order to participate with federal agencies in the development and operation of state trail routes across federal lands. The director may exercise similar authority with respect to segments of the system which cross other public lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5074.7.

If lands included in the system are outside the boundaries of areas administered by public agencies, the director may enter into agreements with private landowners in order to develop and manage such lands as part of the system. The director may accept fee title, easements, or an appropriate lesser interest in private lands for purposes of the development and maintenance of trails designated as part of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.

No funds, whether derived from gift, donation, grant-in-aid, or other source, shall be used by the director for state acquisition of private property in connection with the system unless appropriated by the Budget Bill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 522, Sec. 9.   (AB 1789)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.3.

In specifying criteria and standards for the design and construction of trail routes and complementary facilities as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5071.3, the director shall include the following:

(a) The following routes shall be given priority in the allocation of funds: 

(1) Routes which are in proximity or accessible to major urban areas of the state.

(2) Routes which are located on lands in public ownership.

(3) Routes which provide linkage or access to natural, scenic, historic, or recreational areas of clear statewide significance.

(4) Routes which are, or may be, the subject of agreements providing for participation of other public agencies, cooperating volunteer trail associations, or any combination of those entities, in state trail acquisition, development, or maintenance.

(b) Where feasible, trail uses may be combined on routes within the system; however, where trail use by motor vehicles is incompatible with other trail uses, separate areas and facilities should be provided.

(c) Trails should be located and managed so as to restrict trail users to established routes and to aid in effective law enforcement.

(d) Trails should be located so as to avoid severance of private property and to minimize impact on adjacent landowners and operations. The location of any trail authorized by this article shall, if the property owner so requests, be placed as nearly as physically practicable to the boundary lines of the property traversed by the trail, as such boundary lines existed as of January 1, 1975.

(e) Insofar as possible, trails should be designed and maintained to harmonize with, and complement, established forest, agricultural, and resource management plans. No trail, or property acquisition therefor, shall interfere with a landowner’s water rights or his right to access to the place of exercise of such water rights.

(f) Trails should be planned as a system and each trail segment should be part of the overall system plan.

(g) Trails should be appropriately signed to provide identification, direction, and information.

(h) Rest areas, shelters, sanitary facilities, or other conveniences should be designed and located to meet the needs of trail users, including physically handicapped persons, and to prevent intrusion into surrounding areas.

(i) The department shall erect fences along any trail when requested to do so by the owner of adjacent land, or with the consent of the owner of such land when the department determines it will be in the best interests of the users of the trail and adjoining property owners, and shall place gates in such fences when necessary to afford proper access and at each point of intersection with existing roads, trails, or at used points of access to or across such trail. The department shall maintain such fences and gates in good condition.

(j) A landowner’s right to conduct agricultural, timber harvesting, or mining activities on private lands adjacent to, or in the vicinity of, a trail shall not be restricted because of the presence of the trail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 903, Sec. 3.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.4.

No adjoining property owner is liable for any actions of any type resulting from, or caused by, trail users trespassing on adjoining property, and no adjoining property owner is liable for any actions of any type started on, or taking place within, the boundaries of the trail arising out of the activities of other parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.5.

The director shall prepare a guidebook or guidebooks, including trail maps, describing the system. The guidebook, or guidebooks, shall include information regarding the responsibility of trail users and shall specify rules and regulations for trail use, including measures designed to prevent trespass and damage to public and private property. The director may prepare a combined heritage corridors and accessible trails guidebook. However, the director shall prepare no guidebook or guidebooks of heritage corridors until such time as he determines that the department has available to it adequate volunteers, funds, or a combination thereof, to prepare such guidebook or guidebooks, or until such time as the Legislature appropriates funds sufficient to prepare the guidebook or guidebooks, whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.7.

Each study of potential trail routes for inclusion in the system shall include an evaluation of the impact of the proposed trail route on adjacent landowners. In conducting studies of potential trail routes for inclusion in the system, the director shall give priority to the following:

(a) A trail route linking state parks, federal recreation areas, and other areas of statewide or national significance located in coastal areas.

(b) A trail route through the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta linking scenic and recreation areas of the San Francisco Bay area with state and federal recreation areas in the Lake Tahoe Basin.

(c) East-west trail routes for nonmotorized use linking the state coastal trail route with the existing Pacific Crest Trail.

(d) Trail routes designed principally for boaters along the following waterways:

(1) Eel River in Humboldt, Mendocino, and Trinity Counties.

(2) Smith River in Del Norte County.

(3) Russian River in Sonoma and Mendocino Counties.

(4) Big River in Mendocino County.

(5) Albion River in Mendocino County.

(6) Navarro River in Mendocino County.

(7) Feather River from Thermalito Afterbay to mouth.

(8) Sacramento River from Keswick Dam to mouth.

(9) American River from Folsom Dam to mouth.

(10) South Fork of American River from Coloma to Folsom Lake.

(11) Tuolumne River from O’Shaughnessy Dam to New Don Pedro Reservoir.

(12) Stanislaus River from the Stanislaus Power House to Melones Reservoir.

(13) Colorado River from Needles to the international boundary.

(e) A hiking, bicycling, and horseback riding trail route along the San Joaquin River from Friant Dam to State Highway Route 99.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5075.8.

(a) The department may convene a planning task force in order to facilitate the development of a comprehensive plan for the San Joaquin River Parkway.

The task force shall include, but not be limited to, a representative of the following entities:

(1) State Lands Commission.

(2) Department of Parks and Recreation.

(3) Department of Fish and Game.

(4) State Reclamation Board.

(5) County of Fresno.

(6) County of Madera.

(7) City of Fresno.

(8) Fresno County and City Chamber of Commerce.

(9) Fresno Sand and Gravel Producers.

(10) San Joaquin River Property Owners Association.

(11) Upper San Joaquin River Association.

(12) San Joaquin River Parkway and Conservation Trust.

(13) San Joaquin River Committee.

(b) The plan shall
 be submitted to the Legislature not later than June 1, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 480.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.

In developing the open-space element of a general plan as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 65302 of the Government Code, every city and county shall consider demands for trail-oriented recreational use and shall consider such demands in developing specific open-space programs. Further, every city, county, and district shall consider the feasibility of integrating its trail routes with appropriate segments of the state system.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1461.)
-------------------------------------------

5077.2.

In addition to utilizing criteria and standards for the design, interpretation, and implementation of heritage corridor routes and complementary facilities, as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 5071.3 and paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 5075.3, the director shall include in the plan required by Section 5070.7 the following routes which shall be given priority for designation as heritage corridors:

(a) Routes which connect urban areas with the cross-section of landscape provided in parks and recreation and outdoor resource areas in California.

(b) Routes incorporating existing and planned facilities for ready accessibility for physically disabled persons utilizing coordinated accessibility to several areas and experiences such as trails, water, visitor centers, campsites, parking, and rest rooms.

(c) Existing and planned scenic highways.

(d) Looping routes radiating out of centers of population to allow optimum use.

(e) Routes nominated by local governmental jurisdictions and local volunteer groups.

(f) Routes providing access to the maximum number of recreational trails and other recreational facilities.

(g) Routes intended to direct the public away from areas where trespass or damage to public or private property or natural resources is likely.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

5077.5.

(a) Because of California’s unique potential to encourage initial stages of a nationwide heritage network, the following northern California portions of an eventual nationwide heritage network are hereby designated as heritage corridors:

(1) The California Pioneer and Goldrush Heritage Corridor as the western end of the Transcontinental Historic Heritage Corridor, from San Francisco Bay via the North Lincoln Highway, Highway 40, and present Interstate 80 to Sacramento, Truckee, and the Nevada border.

(2) The Tahoe Pacific/Farms & Forests State Heritage Corridor, as the alternate western end of the Transcontinental Scenic Heritage Corridor, to extend from Fort Bragg to the Pacific Crest along Highway 20, Interstate 80, and south along Highway 89 to South Lake Tahoe and the Nevada border.

(3) The North Central California Coast Heritage Corridor from the San Mateo County Line to Patrick’s Point State Park in Humboldt County.

(b) In order to assist establishment and public involvement with the heritage corridors established in subdivision (a), the director and affected state agencies shall work with nonprofit disability access groups in producing a heritage corridors access map, as defined in Section 5070.3, to be called the North Central California Heritage Corridor Trails and Disability Access Map.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1495, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5077.6.

Because of its clear function as the interpretive highway of the Gold Rush, and because of outstanding efforts of public agencies and the private sector to increase accessibility to physically disabled persons along parts of its route, State Highway Route 49 is hereby designated as a heritage corridor, including all sections which link the Counties of Sierra, Nevada, Placer, El Dorado, Amador, Calaveras, Tuolumne, Mariposa, and Madera, known collectively as California’s Gold Country, and shall be recognized by the Department of Transportation and officially known as the Golden Chain Highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5077.7.

Because of the unique beauty and natural resources of the northern California coast, the desire of many Californians to visit the area, the heavy dependence of the area on the recreation and tourism economy, the recent improvements in access for disabled persons by state and local agencies and nonprofit groups in the area, and the recent increase in available information on access for disabled persons in the area, State Highway Route 1 from the Golden Gate Bridge to Route 101 near Leggett and State Highway Route 101 from that point to the Oregon state line is hereby designated as the Coast Highway Heritage Corridor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 903, Sec. 5.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5077.8.

In order to promote disability access along the heritage corridors, the director shall recognize the South Yuba Independence Trail South Yuba Project as one of California’s primary wheelchair wilderness and backpacking trails.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1495, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.1. State Heritage Networks [5078. - 5078.6.]

5078.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(b) “Fund” means the Heritage Network Decal Fund created pursuant to Section 5066 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) “Heritage corridor” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5070.3.

(d) “Program” means the State Heritage Network Plan and Grants Program.

(e) “Trust” means a State Heritage Network Trust organized pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5078.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.1.

(a) There is in the department the State Heritage Network Plan and Grants Program.

(b) The program shall enhance the protection, preservation, and interpretation of, and access to, natural, agricultural, archaeological, and historical resources within heritage corridors within the state heritage network, and as a component of any state byways system.

(c) The program shall be developed in consultation with interested public and private entities, including any nonprofit State Heritage Network Trust organized to further the purposes of heritage corridors within the state heritage network. A primary purpose of any such trust shall be to assist the department in implementing the program by providing volunteer services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.2.

The money in the fund shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for purposes of paying administrative costs incurred in carrying out the program, for the acquisition, development, use, and enhancement of heritage corridor sites within the state heritage network both within and without the state park system, and, in regard to sites not within the state park system, for matching grants, not to exceed 60 percent state funding, to local agencies, other state agencies, federal agencies, and nonprofit organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.3.

No single grant under the program shall exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Not more than 50 percent of the total money available from the fund each year may be expended by the department for purposes of the state park system. At least 25 percent of the total money available from the fund each year shall be available for grants to nonprofit organizations, including state park cooperating associations. Money available from the fund each year for the development of heritage corridors within the state heritage network shall be utilized, as equally as practicable, for the following purposes.

(a) Disability access projects.

(b) Interpretive facilities, including heritage corridor highway signs.

(c) Interpretive and heritage education programs and interpretive publications, including California Heritage Corridors Access Maps.

(d) Historical preservation and restoration projects.

(e) Trail acquisition and development, except that any acquisition shall be from willing sellers only.

(f) The purchase of land and easements for purposes other than trail or trail corridors from willing sellers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.4.

(a) The department shall develop criteria for the evaluation and selection of heritage corridors.

(b) The following heritage corridors are given provisional status to allow their inclusion in the North Central California Heritage Corridors Access Map:

(1) East California Mountains and Deserts: Mount Lassen to Anza Borrego, including Highways 89 and 395 to Bishop.

(2) Yosemite Pacific: Monterey and San Jose to Mono Lake via Yosemite National Park.

(3) Missions and Adobes: Sonoma to San Diego via El Camino Real.

(4) Great Valley Rivers: Mt. Shasta to Porterville, utilizing scenic alternates to Highway 99 wherever possible.

(c) The following additional candidate heritage corridors are proposed for study and timely adoption:

(1) Redwoods and Cascades: Redwood National Park to Mt. Lassen and Mt. Shasta.

(2) California Contrast: Morro Bay to Death Valley.

(3) Palm and Pine: San Juan Capistrano to Joshua Tree.

(4) Rim of the World: Santa Monica Mountains to Mt. Laguna via the San Gabriel Mountains, San Bernardino Mountains, San Jacinto Mountains, and Mount Palomar.

(5) Southern Borderlands: San Diego to Yuma, Arizona.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.5.

Grant proposals shall be submitted annually to the department for evaluation in accordance with procedures and criteria prescribed by the department. The department shall evaluate annually, with the assistance of the trust, if organized pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5078.1, any proposals submitted to it and shall prepare an annual list of recommended projects for submission to the Legislature for funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.6.

(a) The department may undertake with cooperating heritage corridor groups the design and distribution of a twenty-dollar ($20) window decal to allow participation in the heritage network program by residents and nonresidents of the state.

(b) Revenues derived from the sale of the decal, after deduction for administrative costs, shall be deposited in the Heritage Network Decal Fund, created pursuant to Section 5066 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.1.5. California Heritage Fund [5079. - 5079.74.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5079. - 5079.01.]

5079.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The preservation of California’s historical resources is a responsibility of all citizens, and deserving of continued support through private contributions and efforts and through the use of public funds.

(b) Peoples of many cultures, backgrounds, and abilities have contributed to the economic and social diversity of the state.

(c) Increasing pressures for development, increasing public use, and deterioration through age and exposure continue to place California’s historical resources at risk.

(d) Preservation of historical resources stimulates the economy, promotes energy conservation, contributes to the tourism industry, and enhances the quality of life in California.

(e) The stewardship of historical resources will further educational goals, deepen cultural and historical awareness, and advance the public’s understanding of the existing human environment and institutions.

(f) Therefore, it is the policy of the state to encourage the stewardship and preservation of California’s historical resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.01.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “California Register” means the California Register of Historic Resources.

(b) “Commission” means the State Historical Resources Commission.

(c) “Fund” means the California Heritage Fund created pursuant to Section 5079.10.

(d) “Historical landmark” and “historical resource” have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (i) and subdivision (j), respectively, of Section 5020.1.

(e) “Historical resource preservation project” is a product, facility, or project designed to preserve an historical resource that is listed, or formally determined eligible for listing, in the National Register of Historic Places or the California Register, or designated as a historical landmark or point of historical interest.

(f) “National Register of Historic Places” means the official federal list of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in American history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, and culture as authorized by the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 470 et seq.).

(g) “Nonprofit organization” means any private, nonprofit organization, existing under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, that has, among its principal charitable purposes, the preservation of historic resources for cultural, scientific, historic, educational, recreational, agricultural, or scenic opportunities.

(h) “Office” means the State Office of Historic Preservation.

(i) “Point of historical interest” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (o) of Section 5020.1.

(j) “Preservation” means identification, evaluation, recordation, documentation, curation, acquisition, protection, management, rehabilitation, restoration, stabilization, maintenance, and reconstruction, or any combination of those activities.

(k) “Public agency” means a federal agency, state agency, city, county, district, association of governments, joint powers agency, or tribal organization.

(l) “Stewardship” means the development and implementation of programs for the proper care, interpretation, and repose of items of historic and cultural value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Heritage Fund [5079.10. - 5079.15.]

5079.10.

The California Heritage Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury and shall be administered by the office. Money in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to implement laws providing for historical resource preservation, including, but not limited to, Section 5028 and Executive Order W-26-92, under criteria developed by the office and adopted by the commission. The actual costs incurred by the office in connection with administering and implementing the services and functions authorized in this chapter shall be paid from the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.11.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all funds received by the office for the purposes of historical resource preservation shall be deposited in the fund. The office and the Controller may establish separate accounts in the fund for the purpose of separating deposits according to their origin or intended purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.12.

In addition to any public funds appropriated expressly for the purposes of this chapter, the office may apply for and accept grants, and accept gifts, donations, subventions, rents, royalties, and other financial support, or real or personal property, from private sources. All money received from private sources shall be deposited in a separate account established pursuant to Section 5079.11 and, notwithstanding Section 5079.10, is hereby continuously appropriated to the office for expenditure for historical resources preservation projects pursuant to this chapter after notification to, and project approval by, the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 176.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.13.

The office shall deposit the proceeds from any lease, rental, sale, exchange, or transfer of real property, or any interest therein or option thereon, made pursuant to Section 5079.23, in the fund, together with any other reimbursements, repayments, and income received by the office, unless otherwise provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.14.

When a lease of real property is made to a private individual, group, or entity, the office shall annually transfer an amount not to exceed 25 percent of the gross income from the lease to the city or, if in an unincorporated area, the county in which the real property is located. Fifty percent of the funds received by the city or county shall be used for historical preservation projects, as approved by the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.15.

The office may apply for and receive emergency financial support for projects and areas identified under federal and state emergency and disaster guidelines. These funds shall be available for expenditure for the purposes of this chapter and Article 2 (commencing with Section 5020) of Chapter 1 under criteria developed by the office and adopted by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Functions of the State Office of Historic Preservation [5079.20. - 5079.28.]

5079.20.

(a) Pursuant to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Public Works Board may acquire, on behalf of the office, fee title, or any lesser interest, in any real property whose preservation is required to meet the policies and objectives of the California Register, including any interest required to provide public access to cultural or historical resources.

(b) The office may accept gifts or dedications of real property in order to meet the purposes of this chapter.

(c) The office may enter into an option to purchase real property in order to meet the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.21.

The office may acquire and hold historical resources, artifacts, or objects, or any interest therein, that are required to provide public access to cultural or historical resources. These items may be acquired by purchase, option to purchase, gift, exchange, dedication, or any combination thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.22.

The office may, in order to carry out historic preservation projects for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 5020) of Chapter 1 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 5079.10) of this chapter, initiate, negotiate, and participate in agreements for the preservation and management of historical resources under its control with public agencies, nonprofit organizations, private entities, or individuals, and enter into any other agreements authorized by state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.23.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director of General Services, when so requested by the office, may lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any real property, or interest therein or option to purchase, acquired under this chapter, provided that the Director of General Services determines that the action is in the best interests of the state. The Department of General Services shall be reimbursed for any services rendered pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.24.

The commission shall adopt, and the office shall implement, appropriate procedures to ensure that real property transactions undertaken pursuant to this chapter are carried out in the public interest and with proper notice to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.25.

Money in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for loans and grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to carry out the purposes of this chapter. No loan or grant shall be made except pursuant to an agreement with the office, and subject to terms and conditions approved by the commission, that ensure that the loan or grant carries out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.26.

(a) The office shall encourage and support historical resource preservation through education activities, including publications and training, that further the policies set forth in Section 5079.

(b) The office may enter into contracts with public agencies, nonprofit organizations, or private entities for this purpose and may make grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to carry out these activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.27.

The office may select and contract with other state agencies and with private entities and individuals to provide services necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and Section 5020.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.28.

Criteria for the selection of projects shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The project is representative of the concerns and needs of a broad range of constituencies or an underrepresented constituency.

(b) The proposal considers aspects of the broad political, social, and economic issues of the present and their implications for the future preservation of historical resources.

(c) The project effectively links historical resources preservation issues and concerns with other public policy areas.

(d) The project strengthens and fosters the role of local communities in historical resources preservation issues.

(e) The project supports and enhances the capacity of public policy planning processes to accommodate historical resources preservation issues and concerns.

(f) The project enhances the historic preservation program of certified local governments, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 5020.1, and is consistent with the support of the office of certified local government programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Acquisition of Historical Properties or Objects [5079.35. - 5079.35.]

5079.35.

(a) The office may acquire any interest in real property pursuant to Section 5079.20, or personal property pursuant to Section 5079.21, with historical, including archaeological, significance, or necessary for the preservation or management of any such property, in order to prevent the loss of historic integrity or imminent destruction or to otherwise secure the preservation of the historical resource.

(b) The office may undertake conservation or preservation activities for historical resources acquired under this chapter.

(c) The office shall encourage, to the greatest extent feasible, the acquisition of historical resources by other qualified purchasers, and the acquisition of the property shall only occur with the office acting as the buyer of last resort.

(d) The office shall take all feasible action to return or transfer title to the historical resources to a nonprofit organization, public agency, private entity, or individual, for all properties acquired for historical resources preservation under this chapter.

(e) Prior to taking any action towards the acquisition of any historical property, the office shall consult as needed with the appropriate city or county in order to better assess the historical significance of the historical property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Historical Resources Preservation Projects [5079.40. - 5079.44.]

5079.40.

The office shall award grants on a competitive basis to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the preservation of historical resources. A grant made pursuant to this article may not exceed the lesser of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or 50 percent of the cost of the project. A grant may be awarded on a noncompetitive basis for emergency purposes only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.41.

The office shall adopt guidelines, subject to the approval of the commission, for determination of the amount of matching funds required, if any, for a grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.42.

A public agency may enter into an agreement with a nonprofit organization for the purpose of carrying out a historical resource preservation project funded by a grant made pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.43.

After completion of the historical resource preservation project, the grant recipient shall return to the office the amount of the grant that exceeds the eligible project costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.44.

The office shall consult as needed with the appropriate city or county in order to assess the historical significance of historical resources in connection with an historical resource preservation project proposed pursuant to this article by a nonprofit organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Historical Resource Management Projects [5079.50. - 5079.52.]

5079.50.

The office shall award grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to improve the management of California’s historical resources that, because of natural events or human activities, have suffered impairment or loss of historic integrity. Grants made pursuant to this section shall not be available to acquire public facilities, except to the extent the acquisition is incidental to the historical resource management project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 289.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.51.

After the approval of a proposed historical resource management project, the office may expend funds to prepare a plan for the protection and enhancement of the historical resource.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.52.

The office shall consult as needed with the appropriate city or county in order to assess the historical significance of historical resources in connection with an historical resource management project proposed pursuant to this article by a nonprofit organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Preservation of Significant Archaeological Resource Areas and Associated Artifacts [5079.60. - 5079.65.]

5079.60.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that California’s archaeological resources are endangered by urban development and population growth and by natural forces. The Legislature further finds and declares that these resources need to be preserved in order to illuminate and increase public knowledge concerning the historic and prehistoric past of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.61.

The office may award grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for historical resource preservation projects that include the acquisition of significant archaeological resource areas and artifacts associated with those sites.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 749, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.62.

(a) The amount of the grant shall not exceed the cost of the project.

(b) The amount of the grant and the amount of matching funds required, if any, shall be determined by the office, based on the financial resources available to the grant applicant, the urgency of the project relative to other archaeological projects, the extent to which the project furthers program objectives, and other factors identified by the office and approved by the commission that further the purposes of this chapter.
